Florida, session 2026, HB1557.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Motor Vehicle
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1557-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1557 2026
Data Privacy and Autonomy Act."
Section 2. Section 320.647, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
320.647 Motor vehicle data privacy and autonomy.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Foreign country of concern" has the same meaning as
in s. 692.201.
(b) "Foreign principal" has the same meaning as in s.
692.201.
(c) "Motor vehicle" means any vehicle as defined in s.
320.60 which is registered in this state.
(d) "Operator data" means:
1. Data generated or processed onboard a motor vehicle,
including data generated by sensors, receivers, computer
processing units, or other vehicle components.
2. Data stored in a motor vehicle which is generated by
the operator of the vehicle.
(e) "Operator preference" means any choice with respect to
a configurable setting of a motor vehicle made by or for the
benefit of the operator of the vehicle.
(f) "Personal identifying information" means information
that:
1. Directly identifies a person, such as the name,
address, social security number or other identifying number or
code, telephone number, or e-mail address of the person;
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1557-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1557 2026
2. Indirectly identifies a person, such as the gender,
race, or date of birth of the person; or
3. Reveals the physical location or Internet activity of a
person.
(g) "Proprietary confidential business information" has
the same meaning as in s. 288.075(1).
(h) "Secure" means designed to prevent malicious or
unauthorized use of or access to operator data.
(i) "Technologically neutral" means designed without
preference or prejudice toward any technology or service used to
access and control operator data by a motor vehicle owner,
regardless of ownership or licensing of proprietary technologies
by the owner or a manufacturer.
(2) A manufacturer may not:
(a) Access operator data, unless:
1. The motor vehicle owner affirmatively consents to the
manufacturer accessing the data and the consent:
a. Is freely given;
b. Is informed, specific, and unambiguous;
c. Is in writing; and
d. May be easily withdrawn; or
2. The data is accessed solely to improve motor vehicle
performance or safety;
(b) Sell, lease, or otherwise share operator data, unless:
1. Required to do so:
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1557-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1557 2026
a. Pursuant to a lawful warrant;
b. Pursuant to a court order that provides the motor
vehicle owner notice of the order and at least 48 hours to
object to the order and request a hearing; or
c. To facilitate an emergency response; or
2. Expressly permitted to do so by the owner or, in the
event of the death or incapacity of the owner, the next of kin
of the owner; or
(c) Sell, license, rent, transfer, release, disclose,
provide access to, or otherwise make available personal
identifying information to a foreign country of concern or
foreign principal.
(3)(a) A manufacturer shall provide a motor vehicle owner
with access to and control of operator data:
1. At no additional cost.
2. Without any restriction or limitation by means of a
technologically neutral and secure interface.
(b) To facilitate the access to and control of operator
data pursuant to paragraph (a), the manufacturer shall create a
technologically neutral and secure open application programming
interface that:
1. Facilitates deletion of all operator data stored in a
motor vehicle generated by the operator of the vehicle.
2. Enables the setting of any operator preference.
100 (4) By January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1557-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1557 2026
101 department, in consultation with the Attorney General, the
102 Secretary of Transportation, the United States Secretary of
103 Homeland Security, and the Federal Communications Commission,
104 shall submit to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of
105 the House of Representatives a report that describes:
106 (a) The types of operator data accessed by a manufacturer.
107 (b) The persons or entities, other than a manufacturer,
108 that access operator data.
109 (c) The agencies that access operator data and how the
110 agencies use the data.
111 (d) The persons or entities to which operator data may be
112 sold or otherwise shared.
113 (e) The foreign countries of concern or foreign principals
114 to which operator data may be sold or otherwise shared and how
115 the foreign countries of concern or foreign principals use the
116 data.
117 (f) The cybersecurity capabilities and risks associated
118 with motor vehicles.
119 (g) How often operator data was breached, how the breaches
120 occurred, the persons or entities involved in the breach, and
121 whether any of the persons or entities involved in the breach
122 have ties to foreign countries of concern or foreign principals.
123 (5)(a) By January 1, 2027, the department shall submit to
124 the Commerce Committee of the House of Representatives and the
125 Commerce and Tourism Committee of the Senate a report on the
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1557-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1557 2026
126 current practices employed for operator data generation,
127 storage, transmission, and cybersecurity.
128 (b) By January 1, 2028, the department shall, in
129 coordination with the director of the National Institute of
130 Standards and Technology, relevant industry stakeholders,
131 including manufacturers and motor vehicle owners, and other
132 agencies, establish at least one standard for the interface
133 required in subsection (3).
134 (c) By January 1, 2033, and at least once every 5 years
135 thereafter, the department shall review and revise such standard
136 or standards as appropriate.
137 (6) Except as provided in subsection (3), this section
138 does not require a manufacturer to divulge proprietary
139 confidential business information.
140 (7) A violation of this section is an unfair and deceptive
141 trade practice under part II of chapter 501.
142 (8) The department shall adopt rules to administer this
143 section.
144 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1557-00